Utah statutes.
75-2-102.   Intestate share of spouse.
(1)  The intestate share of a decedent's surviving spouse is:
(a)  the entire intestate estate if:
(i)  no descendant of the decedent survives the decedent; or
(ii)  all of the decedent's surviving descendants are also descendants of the
surviving spouse;
(b)  the first $50,000, plus 1/2 of any balance of the intestate estate, if
one or more of the decedent's surviving descendants are not descendants of the
surviving spouse.
(2)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(b), if the intestate estate passes to both
the decedent's surviving spouse and to other heirs, then any nonprobate
transfer, as defined in Section 75-2-206, received by the surviving spouse is
chargeable against the intestate share of the surviving spouse.
